Illinois, session 104th, HB5220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Article X to Chapter 12 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/Ch. 12 Art. X heading new)7ARTICLE X. AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES 8    (625 ILCS 5/12-1005 new)9    Sec. 12-1005. Definitions. As used in this Article:10    "Autonomous technology" means technology that has the 11capability of controlling the lateral and longitudinal motion 12of a vehicle on a sustained basis without active physical 13control by a human operator, and which further has the ability 14to intentionally depart from its current lane of travel on a 15marked roadway while under automated motion control.16    "Autonomous vehicle" means a vehicle equipped with 17autonomous technology. "Autonomous vehicle" does not include a 18vehicle that is equipped with one or more collision avoidance 19systems, including, but not limited to, electronic blind spot 20assistance, automated emergency braking systems, park assist, 21adaptive cruise control, lane keep assist, lane departure 22warning, traffic jam and queuing assist, or other similar   HB5220- 2 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1systems that enhance safety or provide driver assistance, but 2are not capable, collectively or singularly, of driving the 3vehicle without the active control or monitoring of a human 4operator.5    "Emergency" means a sudden, unexpected occurrence 6demanding immediate action to prevent or mitigate loss or 7damage to life, health, property, or essential public 8services.9    "Emergency geofencing message" means a message delivered 10using commonly available communication methods to identify a 11location using a street address, intersection, coordinates, or 12any other reasonable and customary way of identifying a 13location, that directs an autonomous vehicle to leave or avoid 14an area because of an emergency.15    "Emergency response official" includes, but is not limited 16to, emergency dispatchers, peace officers as defined in 17Section 1-157.5, and first responders.18    "Manufacturer" means the person, as defined in Section 195-109, that originally manufactures a vehicle and equips 20autonomous technology on the originally completed vehicle or, 21in the case of a vehicle not originally equipped with 22autonomous technology by the vehicle manufacturer, the person 23that modifies the vehicle by installing autonomous technology 24to convert it to an autonomous vehicle after the vehicle was 25originally manufactured.26    "Notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance" means a   HB5220- 3 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1notice issued by a peace officer, as defined in Section 21-157.5, that identifies, at minimum, an alleged violation of 3this Code or an alleged violation of a local traffic ordinance 4adopted pursuant to this Code by an autonomous vehicle while 5the autonomous technology is engaged, the date, time, and 6location of the alleged violation, and the license plate 7number of the autonomous vehicle.8    "Operator" means the person who is seated in the driver's 9seat of the autonomous vehicle, or, if there is no person in 10the driver's seat, causes the autonomous technology to engage.11    "Partial driving automation feature" has the same meaning 12as "Level 2 partial driving automation" in the Society of 13Automotive Engineers (SAE) Standard J3016 (April 2021).14    "Vehicle Services Department" means the Secretary of State 15Vehicle Services Department. 16    (625 ILCS 5/12-1010 new)17    Sec. 12-1010. Operation of autonomous vehicles; Vehicle 18Services Department rules. 19    (a) An autonomous vehicle may be operated on public roads 20for testing purposes by a driver who possesses the proper 21class of license for the type of vehicle being operated if all 22of the following requirements are met:23        (1) The autonomous vehicle is being operated on roads 24    in this State solely by employees, contractors, or other 25    persons designated by the manufacturer of the autonomous   HB5220- 4 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1    technology.2        (2) The driver shall be seated in the driver's seat, 3    monitoring the safe operation of the autonomous vehicle, 4    and capable of taking over immediate manual control of the 5    autonomous vehicle in the event of an autonomous 6    technology failure or other emergency.7        (3) Prior to the start of testing in this State, the 8    manufacturer performing the testing shall obtain an 9    instrument of insurance, surety bond, or proof of 10    self-insurance in the amount of $5,000,000, and shall 11    provide evidence of the insurance, surety bond, or 12    self-insurance to the Vehicle Services Department in the 13    form and manner required by the Vehicle Services 14    Department pursuant to the rules adopted pursuant to 15    subsection (c).16    (b) Except as provided in subsection (a), an autonomous 17vehicle shall not be operated on public roads until the 18manufacturer submits an application to the Vehicle Services 19Department, and that application is approved by the Vehicle 20Services Department pursuant to the rules adopted pursuant to 21subsection (c). The application shall contain, at a minimum, 22all of the following certifications:23        (1) A certification by the manufacturer that the 24    autonomous technology satisfies all of the following 25    requirements:26            (A) The autonomous vehicle has a mechanism to   HB5220- 5 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1        engage and disengage the autonomous technology that is 2        easily accessible to the operator.3            (B) The autonomous vehicle has a visual indicator 4        inside the cabin to indicate when the autonomous 5        technology is engaged.6            (C) The autonomous vehicle has a system to safely 7        alert the operator if an autonomous technology failure 8        is detected while the autonomous technology is 9        engaged, and when an alert is given, the system shall:10                (i) require the operator to take control of 11            the autonomous vehicle; or12                (ii) if the operator does not or is unable to 13            take control of the autonomous vehicle, the 14            autonomous vehicle shall be capable of coming to a 15            complete stop.16            (D) The autonomous vehicle shall allow the 17        operator to take control in multiple manners, 18        including, without limitation, through the use of the 19        brake, the accelerator pedal, or the steering wheel, 20        and it shall alert the operator that the autonomous 21        technology has been disengaged.22            (E) The autonomous vehicle's autonomous technology 23        meets Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards for the 24        autonomous vehicle's model year and all other 25        applicable safety standards and performance 26        requirements set forth in State and federal law and   HB5220- 6 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1        the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those 2        laws.3            (F) The autonomous technology does not make 4        inoperative any Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards 5        for the autonomous vehicle's model year and all other 6        applicable safety standards and performance 7        requirements set forth in State and federal law and 8        the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those 9        laws.10            (G) The autonomous vehicle has a separate 11        mechanism, in addition to, and separate from, any 12        other mechanism required by law, to capture and store 13        the autonomous technology sensor data for at least 30 14        seconds before a collision occurs between the 15        autonomous vehicle and another vehicle, object, or 16        natural person while the autonomous vehicle is 17        operating in autonomous mode. The autonomous 18        technology sensor data shall be captured and stored in 19        a read-only format by the mechanism so that the data is 20        retained until extracted from the mechanism by an 21        external device capable of downloading and storing the 22        data. The data shall be preserved for three years 23        after the date of the collision.24            (H) The autonomous vehicle is equipped, in 25        addition to cameras, with 2 distinct sensing 26        modalities that can detect and track obstacles in the   HB5220- 7 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1        event of failure of the camera system. Qualifying 2        sensors include radar and lidar sensors.3        (2) A certification that the manufacturer has tested 4    the autonomous technology on public roads and has complied 5    with the testing standards, if any, established by the 6    Vehicle Services Department pursuant to subsection (c).7        (3) A certification that the manufacturer will 8    maintain, an instrument of insurance, a surety bond, or 9    proof of self-insurance as specified in rules adopted by 10    the Vehicle Services Department pursuant to subsection 11    (c), in an amount of $5,000,000.12    (c) The Vehicle Services Department shall adopt rules 13setting forth requirements for the submission of evidence of 14insurance, surety bond, or self-insurance required by 15subsection (a), the submission and approval of an application 16to operate an autonomous vehicle pursuant to subsection (b), 17and processes related to notices of autonomous vehicle 18noncompliance pursuant to Section 12-1020.19    The rules shall include any testing, equipment, and 20performance standards, in addition to those established for 21purposes of subsection (a), that the Vehicle Services 22Department concludes are necessary to ensure the safe 23operation of autonomous vehicles on public roads, with or 24without the presence of a driver inside the autonomous 25vehicle. In developing these rules, the Vehicle Services 26Department may consult with the Illinois State Police Division   HB5220- 8 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1of Patrol, the Center for Transportation at the University of 2Illinois Urbana-Champaign, or any other entity identified by 3the Vehicle Services Department that has expertise in 4automotive technology, automotive safety, and autonomous 5system design.6    The Vehicle Services Department shall consult recent 7reports and studies concerning autonomous vehicle safety to 8design a permitting framework which includes multiple testing 9and commercial deployment permits based on achievable safety 10metrics.11    The Vehicle Services Department may establish additional 12requirements by the adoption of rules, which it determines, in 13consultation with the Illinois State Police Division of 14Patrol, are necessary to ensure the safe operation of 15autonomous vehicles on public roads, including, but not 16limited to, rules regarding the aggregate number of 17deployments of autonomous vehicles on public roads, special 18rules for the registration of autonomous vehicles, new license 19requirements for operators of autonomous vehicles, rules for 20notices of autonomous vehicle noncompliance, and rules for 21revocation, suspension, or denial of any license or any 22approval issued pursuant to this Section.23    The Vehicle Services Department shall hold public hearings 24on the adoption of any rules applicable to the operation of an 25autonomous vehicle without the presence of a driver inside the 26autonomous vehicle.  HB5220- 9 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1    (d) The Vehicle Services Department shall approve an 2application submitted by a manufacturer pursuant to subsection 3(b) if it finds that the applicant has submitted all 4information and completed testing necessary to satisfy the 5Vehicle Services Department that the autonomous vehicles are 6safe to operate on public roads and the applicant has complied 7with all requirements specified in the rules adopted by the 8Vehicle Services Department pursuant to subsection (c).9    Notwithstanding this subsection, if the application seeks 10approval for autonomous vehicles capable of operating without 11the presence of a driver inside the autonomous vehicle, the 12Vehicle Services Department may impose additional requirements 13it deems necessary to ensure the safe operation of those 14autonomous vehicles, and may require the presence of a driver 15in the driver's seat of the autonomous vehicle if it 16determines, based on its review pursuant to this subsection, 17that such a requirement is necessary to ensure the safe 18operation of those autonomous vehicles on public roads.19    (e) The Vehicle Services Department shall post a public 20notice on its Internet website when it adopts the rules 21required by subsection (c). The Vehicle Services Department 22shall not approve an application submitted pursuant to the 23rules until 30 days after the public notice is provided.24    (f) Federal regulations adopted by the National Highway 25Traffic Safety Administration shall supersede the provisions 26of this Section if found to be in conflict with any other State   HB5220- 10 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1law or rule.2    (g) The manufacturer of the autonomous technology 3installed on a vehicle shall provide a written disclosure to 4the purchaser of an autonomous vehicle that describes what 5information is collected by the autonomous technology equipped 6on the vehicle. The Vehicle Services Department may adopt 7rules to assess a fee upon a manufacturer that submits an 8application pursuant to subsection (b) to operate autonomous 9vehicles on public roads in an amount necessary to recover all 10costs reasonably incurred by the Vehicle Services Department.11    (h) If an autonomous vehicle does not have a person in the 12driver's seat and commits a traffic violation pursuant to this 13Code, the citation shall be issued to the manufacturer and may 14be issued by mail.15    If an autonomous vehicle has a person in the driver's seat 16and commits a traffic violation pursuant to this Code while 17the autonomous technology is engaged, the citation shall be 18issued to the manufacturer and may be issued by mail.19    If an autonomous vehicle has a person in the driver's seat 20and commits a traffic violation pursuant to this Code while 21the autonomous technology is not engaged, the citation shall 22be issued to the driver.23    The holder of the testing permit or deployment permit may 24contest a citation or penalty under the procedures in this 25Code.   HB5220- 11 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1    (625 ILCS 5/12-1015 new)2    Sec. 12-1015. Manufacturer requirements.3    (a) A manufacturer shall comply with all of the following 4requirements:5        (1) A manufacturer operating an autonomous vehicle 6    under a testing permit or deployment permit issued by the 7    Vehicle Services Department shall maintain a dedicated 8    emergency response telephone line that is available for 9    emergency response officials during all hours when an 10    autonomous vehicle is on a public road. The telephone line 11    shall be available at no cost to public agencies.12        The manufacturer shall continuously monitor the status 13    of each autonomous vehicle on a public road and shall 14    equip and staff the telephone line to ensure that calls 15    are picked up within 30 seconds by a remote human operator 16    who has situational awareness of all autonomous vehicles 17    on public roads.18        The remote human operator shall have the ability to 19    immobilize the autonomous vehicle, allow an emergency 20    response official to move the autonomous vehicle, or cause 21    the autonomous vehicle to move as directed by an emergency 22    response official.23        (2) A manufacturer operating an autonomous vehicle 24    under a testing permit or deployment permit issued by the 25    Vehicle Services Department shall equip each autonomous 26    vehicle with a 2-way voice communication device that   HB5220- 12 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1    enables emergency response officials that are near the 2    vehicle to communicate effectively with a remote human 3    operator who has situational awareness about the 4    autonomous vehicle. The manufacturer shall ensure that an 5    emergency response official is able to reach a remote 6    human operator within 30 seconds after making a request 7    through the device.8        The remote human operator shall have the ability to 9    immobilize the autonomous vehicle, allow an emergency 10    response official to move the autonomous vehicle, or cause 11    the autonomous vehicle to move as directed by an emergency 12    response official.13        (3) Autonomous vehicles equipped with an override 14    system in the autonomous vehicle that allows someone 15    physically present to move the vehicle, pursuant to 16    subparagraphs (A) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subsection 17    (b) of Section 12-1010 shall provide access to the 18    override system to law enforcement and firefighters in 19    case of emergency to allow law enforcement and 20    firefighters to completely immobilize the autonomous 21    vehicle or cause the autonomous vehicle to move as 22    necessary to address the emergency. The manufacturer shall 23    provide training for law enforcement and firefighters on 24    the use of the override system. The training shall be 25    reviewed on a regular basis by the manufacturer and 26    updated as changes are needed.  HB5220- 13 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1    (b) The Vehicle Services Department shall not renew, 2reinstate, or approve an expansion of the operational design 3domain of a permit unless the manufacturer certifies that it 4is in full compliance with the requirements under subsection 5(a).6    (c) An emergency response official may issue an emergency 7geofencing message to a manufacturer.8    Within 2 minutes of receiving an emergency geofencing 9message, a manufacturer shall issue direction to its fleet to 10leave or avoid the area identified.11    Within 30 business days of receiving a notice that an 12emergency response official wishes to begin issuing emergency 13geofencing messages, a manufacturer shall provide the 14emergency response official with all information necessary for 15the emergency response official to begin issuing emergency 16geofencing messages and for the manufacturer to receive and 17respond to emergency geofencing messages.18    An emergency geofencing message shall include the initial 19duration for the defined avoidance area based on a reasonable 20assessment of the emergency. If necessary, an emergency 21response official may extend the duration for the avoidance 22area.23    (d) This Section shall only apply to manufacturers of 24autonomous vehicles that operate without a human operator 25physically present in the autonomous vehicle.26    (e) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (a) and   HB5220- 14 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1subsection (b) shall not apply to a commercial motor vehicle 2with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 3at least 10,001 pounds, whichever is greater. The Vehicle 4Services Department may establish requirements by the adoption 5of rules, determined in consultation with the Illinois State 6Police Division of Patrol, to ensure the safe interaction 7between autonomous commercial motor vehicles and emergency 8response officials. 9    (625 ILCS 5/12-1020 new)10    Sec. 12-1020. Notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance.11    (a) A peace officer, as defined in Section 1-157.5, may 12issue a notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance upon 13observing an alleged violation of this Code or an alleged 14violation of a local traffic ordinance adopted pursuant to 15this Code.16    (b) A manufacturer of an autonomous vehicle shall provide 17any issued notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance to the 18Vehicle Services Department within 72 hours of issuance, or 19within a timeframe otherwise determined by the Vehicle 20Services Department. The Vehicle Services Department shall 21make available a means by which the manufacturer can provide 22the notice.23    (c) The issuance of a notice of autonomous vehicle 24noncompliance shall not create a presumption that the 25autonomous vehicle is unsafe and shall not limit the   HB5220- 15 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1manufacturer's ability to contest the nature or occurrence of 2an alleged violation identified in the notice.3    (d) This Section shall not become operative until the 4Vehicle Services Department issues rules addressing notices of 5autonomous vehicle noncompliance, as required by Section 612-1010. 7    (625 ILCS 5/12-1025 new)8    Sec. 12-1025. Severability. The provisions of this Article 9are severable. If any provision of this Article or its 10application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect 11other provisions or applications that can be given effect 12without the invalid provision or application. 13    (625 ILCS 5/12-1030 new)14    Sec. 12-1030. Dealer and manufacturer prohibitions.15    (a) A dealer or manufacturer shall not sell any new 16passenger vehicle that is equipped with any partial driving 17automation feature, or provide any software update or other 18vehicle upgrade that adds any partial driving automation 19feature, without, at the time of delivering or upgrading the 20vehicle, providing the buyer or owner with a distinct notice 21that provides the name of the feature and clearly describes 22the functions and limitations of the feature.23    (b) A manufacturer or dealer shall not name any partial 24driving automation feature, or describe any partial driving   HB5220- 16 -LRB104 20112 LNS 33563 b1automation feature in marketing materials, using language that 2implies or would otherwise lead a reasonable person to 3believe, that the feature allows the vehicle to function as an 4autonomous vehicle or otherwise has functionality not actually 5included in the feature. A violation of this subsection shall 6be considered a misleading advertisement for the purposes of 7the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.8    (c) Compliance with this Section shall not alter any 9existing duty of care or limit the civil liability of a 10manufacturer or dealer, including, but not limited to, claims 11for negligence or product defect.12    (d) Before delivering a passenger vehicle equipped with a 13partial driving automation feature to a dealer, a manufacturer 14shall provide information to enable the dealer to comply with 15subsection (a). This information shall include specific 16language recommended for the notice required in that 17subsection. A dealer may reasonably rely on the information 18provided by the manufacturer and a dealer shall not be held in 19violation of subsection (a) if the manufacturer fails to 20provide this information to the dealer or if the information 21provided is deemed to be not in compliance with this Section.22    (e) A manufacturer shall not be held in violation of 23subsection (a) if the manufacturer provides a dealer with the 24information required under subsection (d) and the dealer fails 25to provide the required notice to the buyer or owner.